Missouri, session 2026, HB3148.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 84.120, 84.570, and 590.030, RSMo, are repealed and three new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 84.120, 84.570, and 590.030, to read
as follows:
84.120. 1. (1) No person shall be appointed or employed as policeman, turnkey, or
officer of police who shall have been convicted of, or against whom any indictment may be
pending, for any offense, the punishment of which may be confinement in the penitentiary[;
nor]. No person shall [any person] be so appointed who is not of good character, [or who is
not a citizen of the United States,] or who is not able to read and write the English language,
or who does not possess ordinary physical strength and courage. The patrolmen and turnkeys
hereafter appointed shall serve while they shall faithfully perform their duties and possess
mental and physical ability and be subject to removal only for cause after a hearing by the
boards, who are hereby invested with the jurisdiction in the premises.
(2) Any person appointed or employed as a policeman, turnkey, or officer of
police shall be a citizen of the United States or shall be a lawful permanent resident of
the United States who has been honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the
United States.
2. The board shall have the sole discretion whether to delegate portions of its
jurisdiction to hearing officers. The board shall retain final and ultimate authority over such
matters and over the person to whom the delegation may be made. In any hearing before the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3148 2
board under this section, the member involved may make application to the board to waive a
hearing before the board and request that a hearing be held before a hearing officer.
3. Nothing in this section or chapter shall be construed to prohibit the board of police
commissioners from delegating any task related to disciplinary matters, disciplinary hearings,
or any other hearing or proceeding which could otherwise be heard by the board or
concerning any determination related to whether an officer is able to perform the necessary
functions of the position. Tasks related to the preceding matter may be delegated by the board
to a hearing officer under the provisions of subsection 4 of this section.
4. (1) The hearing officer to whom a delegation has been made by the board may, at
the sole discretion of the board, perform certain functions, including but not limited to the
following:
(a) Presiding over a disciplinary matter from its inception through to the final hearing;
(b) Preparing a report to the board of police commissioners; and
(c) Making recommendations to the board of police commissioners as to the
allegations and the appropriateness of the recommended discipline.
(2) The board shall promulgate rules, which may be changed from time to time as
determined by the board, and shall make such rules known to the hearing officer or others.
(3) The board shall at all times retain the authority to render the final decision after a
review of the relevant documents, evidence, transcripts, videotaped testimony, or report
prepared by the hearing officer.
5. Hearing officers shall be selected in the following manner:
(1) The board shall establish a panel of not less than five persons, all who are to be
licensed attorneys in good standing with the Missouri Bar. The composition of the panel may
change from time to time at the board's discretion;
(2) From the panel, the relevant member or officer and a police department
representative shall alternatively and independently strike names from the list with the last
remaining name being the designated hearing officer. The board shall establish a process to
be utilized for each hearing which will determine which party makes the first strike and the
process may change from time to time;
(3) After the hearing officer is chosen and presides over a matter, such hearing officer
shall become ineligible until all hearing officers listed have been utilized, at which time the
list shall renew, subject to officers' availability.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the board of police
commissioners to remove or discharge any chief, as that term is defined in section 106.273.
84.570. 1. (1) No person shall be appointed policeman or officer of police who shall
have been convicted of any offense, the punishment of which may be confinement in the state
penitentiary[; nor]. No person shall [any person] be appointed who is not proven to be of

HB 3148 3
good character, [or who is not proven to be a bona fide citizen of the United States,] or who
cannot read and write the English language and who does not possess ordinary physical
strength and courage, nor shall any person be originally appointed to said police force who is
less than twenty-one years of age. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board
shall have the sole authority to determine conditions of employment for police officers
pursuant to section 84.460.
(2) Any person appointed as a policeman or officer of police shall be a citizen of
the United States or shall be a lawful permanent resident of the United States who has
been honorably discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States.
2. In the interest of efficiency and public safety, law enforcement officers, as such
term is defined in 29 U.S.C. Section 630 or any successor statute, shall be separated from
service on the last day of the month in which the employee becomes sixty-five years of age or
reaches thirty-five years of creditable service, as such term is defined in subdivision (8) of
section 86.900, whichever occurs later.
3. The board shall from time to time require open competitive examinations or tests
for determining the qualifications and fitness of all applicants for appointment to positions on
the police force. Such examinations and tests shall be practical and shall relate to matters
which fairly measure the relative fitness of the candidates to discharge the duties of the
positions to which they seek to be appointed. Notice of such examinations and tests shall be
given not less than ten days in advance thereof by public advertisement in at least one
newspaper of general circulation in such city, and by posting notice in the police headquarters
building. A list of those qualifying in such examinations shall be established, listing those
qualified in order of rank. When an appointment is to be made, the appointment shall be
made from such eligible list.
4. The board shall also establish rules for:
(1) Temporary employment for not exceeding sixty days in the absence of any
eligible list;
(2) Hours of work of police employees and officers subject to the provisions of
section 84.510; and
(3) Attendance regulations and leaves of absence.
590.030. 1. The POST commission shall establish minimum standards for the basic
training of peace officers. Such standards may vary for each class of license established
pursuant to subsection 2 of section 590.020.
2. The director shall establish minimum age, citizenship, and general education
requirements and may require a qualifying score on a certification examination as conditions
of eligibility for a peace officer license. Such general education requirements shall require

HB 3148 4
completion of a high school program of education under chapter 167 or obtainment of a
General Educational Development (GED) certificate.
3. The director shall provide for the licensure, with or without additional basic
training, of peace officers possessing credentials by other states or jurisdictions, including
federal and military law enforcement officers.
4. The director shall establish a procedure for obtaining a peace officer license and
shall issue the proper license when the requirements of this chapter have been met.
5. As conditions of licensure, all licensed peace officers shall:
(1) Obtain continuing law enforcement education pursuant to rules to be promulgated
by the POST commission;
(2) Maintain a current address of record on file with the director; and
(3) Submit to being fingerprinted on or before January 1, 2022, and at any time a
peace officer is commissioned with a different law enforcement agency, for the purposes of a
criminal history background check and enrollment in the state and federal Rap Back
programs, pursuant to section 43.540. The criminal history background check shall include
the records of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The resulting report shall be forwarded to
the officer's commissioning law enforcement agency at the time of enrollment and Rap Back
enrollment shall be for the purpose of the requirements of subsection 3 of section 590.070 and
subsection 2 of section 590.118. An officer shall take all necessary steps to maintain
enrollment in Rap Back at all law enforcement agencies where the officer is commissioned
for as long as the officer is commissioned with a law enforcement agency or that agency.
6. A peace officer license shall automatically expire if the licensee fails to hold a
commission as a peace officer for a period of five consecutive years, provided that the POST
commission shall provide for the relicensure of such persons and may require retraining as a
condition of eligibility for relicensure, and provided that the director may provide for the
continuing licensure, subject to restrictions, of persons who hold and exercise a law
enforcement commission requiring a peace officer license but not meeting the definition of a
peace officer pursuant to this chapter.
7. All law enforcement agencies shall enroll in the state and federal Rap Back
programs on or before January 1, 2022, and continue to remain enrolled. The law
enforcement agency shall take all necessary steps to maintain officer enrollment for all
officers commissioned with that agency in the Rap Back programs. An officer shall submit to
being fingerprinted at any law enforcement agency upon commissioning and for as long as
the officer is commissioned with that agency.
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any citizenship
requirements established by the POST commission as a condition of eligibility for a
peace officer license shall allow a person to serve as a law enforcement officer if he or

HB 3148 5
she is a lawful permanent resident of the United States who has been honorably
discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States.
✔